Hawaii statutes.
§183-20 Disposition. The department,
at any time, without notice to the owners, may remove any and all cattle or
horses found on any forest reserve, game management area, public hunting area,
or natural area reserve and may hold and care for the cattle or horses in some
convenient place, at the expense of the owners, subject to the lien for charges
and expenses as herein provided. The owners of the cattle or horses shall pay
to the department the actual expenses reasonably incurred, which shall include,
but not be limited to, allowances for employees' wages, equipment cost,
transportation cost, feeding cost, cost of public notice, and other costs
related to the catching, driving, and transportation of animals. After the
cattle or horses have been removed and held, the owners shall be notified
personally of this fact, if the owners are known, and shall be notified of the
total amount of the charges and expenses to be paid for the release of the
cattle or horses.

When the owners are unknown or cannot be found,
the department shall give public notice in the county in which the cattle or
horses are held. The notice shall set forth the general description and the
brands of all the cattle or horses so removed and held and shall notify the
owners and the public generally that unless the charges and costs to be
specified in the notice shall have been paid on or before the date therein
specified, which date shall not be less than two weeks from the date of the
last notice, the cattle or horses therein described shall be sold at public
auction for cash to the highest bidder for the purpose of satisfying the lien
on the same for the costs and charges in the notice set forth. The notice
shall be given once a week for four consecutive weeks. If the charges and costs,
together with any additional expenses that may have been incurred since the
first notice, are not paid before the date stated in the notice, the cattle or
horses on that date shall be sold and all charges and other expenses shall be
satisfied out of the proceeds of the sale and the balance paid to the owner or
owners of the cattle or horses. If no claim is made for any balance within
sixty days after the date of sale, the balance shall be deposited in the
treasury of the State as a government realization and all private rights
therein and thereto shall be thereafter forever barred. [L 1921, c 222, pt of
§2; RL 1925, §586, subs 10; am L 1927, c 54, §4; RL 1935, §193; RL 1945, §1028;
RL 1955, §19-11; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §1; HRS §183-20;
am L 1981, c 85, §8; am L 1988, c 337, §4; am L 1998, c 2, §48]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next